apertium-nn-nb.nb.dix
<pardef n="sm/ette__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>      <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>etta</l>      <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettet</l>     <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etter</l>     <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettes</l>     <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>       <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>etta</l>      <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ettet</l>     <r>ette<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>etta</l>        <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etten</l>       <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ettet</l>       <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>etta</l>        <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettet</l>       <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>etne</l>        <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>etta</l>        <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettede</l>      <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ettete</l>      <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>etne</l>        <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>etta</l>        <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettede</l>      <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ettete</l>      <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ettende</l>     <r>ette<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="skjem/me__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>         <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>         <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>mede</l>      <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>mete</l>      <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>mede</l>      <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>mete</l>      <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mende</l>     <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>         <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>met</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sv/ive__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ivd</l>         <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivd</l>         <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivde</l>        <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivde</l>        <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivende</l>      <r>ive<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iv</l>        <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ives</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ivd</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iver</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ives</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiv</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="blek/ke__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>         <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>         <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kede</l>      <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>kete</l>      <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>kede</l>      <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kete</l>      <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kende</l>     <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>k</l>         <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>         <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ker</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="smette">          <i>sm</i><par n="sm/ette__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blekke"><i>blek</i><par n="blek/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skjemme"><i>skjem</i><par n="skjem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skvette"><i>skv</i><par n="sm/ette__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sprette"><i>spr</i><par n="sm/ette__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="svive"><i>sv</i><par n="sv/ive__vblex_adj"/></e>
